Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
431M

MENTAL
HEALTH AND ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER

TREATMENT
INSURANCE BENEFITS

Section

431M-1 Definitions

431M-2 Policy coverage

431M-3 Repealed

431M-4 Mental illness, alcohol and drug
dependence benefits

431M-5, 5.5 Repealed

431M-6 Rules

431M-7 Preservation of certain benefits

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2015, c 63, §24.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next